fi: Melodikan mukana tulevat lisävarusteet: Kantokassi (pehmeä); Kantokotelo (kova); Puhdistusharja/pyyhin; Puhdistusliina; Jatkoputki; Joustava suuputki; Ohjekirja / laulukirja; Suukappale; Varasuukappale; Rannehihna; Muu
tr: Dahil olan melodika aksesuarları: Taşıma çantası (yumuşak); Taşıma kılıfı (sert); Temizleme fırçası/bezi; Temizleme bezi; Uzatma borusu; Esnek ağızlık borusu; Kullanım kılavuzu / şarkı kitabı; Ağızlık; Yedek ağızlık; Bileklik; Diğer
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki k melodiki: Torbica za nošenje (mehka); Kovček za prenašanje (trd); Ščetka/krpica za čiščenje; Krpa za čiščenje; Podaljševalna cev; Gibljiva ustna cev; Navodila za uporabo / pesmarica; Ustnik; Nadomestni ustnik; Zapestni trak; Drugo
pt-BR: Acessórios incluídos com a melódica: Bolsa de transporte (macia); Estojo de transporte (rígido); Escova/Haste de limpeza; Pano de limpeza; Tubo de extensão; Tubo de bocal flexível; Manual de instruções / livro de músicas; Bocal; Bocal sobressalente; Alça de pulso; Outro
sk-SK: Súčasťou melodiky je príslušenstvo: Taška na prenášanie (mäkká); Puzdro na prenášanie (tvrdé); Čistiaca kefka/tampón; Čistiaca handrička; Predlžovacia trubica; Ohybná trubica do úst; Návod na použitie / spevník; Náustok; Náhradný náustok; Remienok na zápästie; Iné
vi: Phụ kiện đi kèm của kèn melodica: Túi đựng (mềm); Hộp đựng (cứng); Cọ/que vệ sinh; Khăn lau; Ống nối dài; Ống thổi mềm; Sách hướng dẫn / sách bài hát; Ống ngậm; Ống ngậm dự phòng; Dây đeo cổ tay; Khác
da: Melodikatilbehør medfølger: Bæretaske (blød); Bærekasse (hård); Rensebørste/-pind; Renseklud; Forlængerrør; Fleksibelt mundrør; Brugsanvisning / sangbog; Mundstykke; Ekstra mundstykke; Håndledsstrop; Andet
zh-CN: 口风琴附带配件: 便携袋（软）; 便携盒（硬）; 清洁刷/棉签; 清洁布; 延长管; 软质吹管; 说明书/曲谱本; 吹嘴; 备用吹嘴; 腕带; 其他
el: Αξεσουάρ που περιλαμβάνονται στη μελόντικα: Τσάντα μεταφοράς (μαλακή); Θήκη μεταφοράς (σκληρή); Βουρτσάκι/πανί καθαρισμού; Πανάκι καθαρισμού; Σωλήνας προέκτασης; Εύκαμπτος σωλήνας επιστομίου; Εγχειρίδιο οδηγιών / βιβλίο με παρτιτούρες; Επιστόμιο; Εφεδρικό επιστόμιο; Λουράκι καρπού; Άλλο
it: Accessori inclusi della melodica: Borsa per il trasporto (morbida); Custodia per il trasporto (rigida); Scovolino per la pulizia; Panno per la pulizia; Tubo di prolunga; Tubo flessibile per boccaglio; Manuale di istruzioni / libro di canzoni; Boccaglio; Boccaglio di ricambio; Cinturino da polso; Altro
cs: Součástí balení je melodika: Cestovní taška (měkká); Pouzdro (tvrdé); Čisticí kartáček / vytěrák; Čisticí hadřík; Prodlužovací trubice; Flexibilní ústní trubice; Návod k použití / zpěvník; Náustek; Náhradní náustek; Řemínek na zápěstí; Jiné
fr: Accessoires fournis avec la mélodica: Sac de transport (souple); Étui de transport (rigide); Brosse/Écouvillon de nettoyage; Chiffon de nettoyage; Tube d’extension; Tuyau buccal flexible; Manuel d’instructions / recueil de chansons; Embout buccal; Embout buccal de rechange; Dragonne; Autre
ru: Аксессуары, включенные в мелодику: Сумка для переноски (мягкая); Футляр для переноски (жесткий); Щетка/шомпол для чистки; Салфетка для чистки; Удлинительная трубка; Гибкая трубка для мундштука; Руководство / сборник песен; Мундштук; Запасной мундштук; Ремешок на запястье; Другое
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за мелодика: Чанта за носене (мека); Калъф за носене (твърд); Четка/тампон за почистване; Кърпа за почистване; Удължителна тръба; Гъвкава тръба за уста; Ръководство за употреба / песнопойка; Мундщук; Резервен мундщук; Каишка за китка; Друго
ko: 멜로디카 포함 액세서리: 휴대용 가방(소프트); 휴대용 케이스(하드); 청소용 브러시/면봉; 청소용 천; 연장 튜브; 플렉서블 마우스 튜브; 사용 설명서/노래책; 마우스피스; 예비 마우스피스; 손목 스트랩; 기타
nl: Inbegrepen accessoires melodica: Draagtas (zacht); Draagkoffer (hard); Schoonmaakborstel/wisser; Schoonmaakdoekje; Verlengbuis; Flexibele mondslang; Instructiehandleiding / liedboek; Mondstuk; Reservemondstuk; Polsband; Overige
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za melodiku: Torba za nošenje (meka); Kovčeg za nošenje (tvrdi); Četka/štapić za čišćenje; Krpica za čišćenje; Produžna cijev; Fleksibilna cijev za usta; Priručnik s uputama / pjesmarica; Usnik; Rezervni usnik; Remenčić za zapešće; Ostalo
pt-PT: Acessórios incluídos com a melódica: Saco de transporte (flexível); Estojo de transporte (rígido); Escova/esfregão de limpeza; Pano de limpeza; Tubo de extensão; Tubo de bocal flexível; Manual de instruções/cancioneiro; Bocal; Bocal sobresselente; Correia de pulso; Outro
hu: Melodika tartozékok a csomagban: Hordtáska (puha); Hordozó tok (kemény); Tisztítókefe/törlőkendő; Tisztítókendő; Hosszabbító cső; Hajlékony fúvócső; Használati útmutató / kottás füzet; Fúvóka; Tartalék fúvóka; Csuklópánt; Egyéb
de: Mitgeliefertes Zubehör zur Melodica: Tragetasche (weich); Tragekoffer (hart); Reinigungsbürste/-tupfer; Reinigungstuch; Verlängerungsschlauch; Flexibles Anblasrohr; Bedienungsanleitung / Liederbuch; Mundstück; Ersatzmundstück; Handgelenkschlaufe; Sonstiges
pl: Akcesoria dołączone do harmonijki klawiszowej: Torba (miękka); Etui (twarde); Szczoteczka/wycior do czyszczenia; Ściereczka do czyszczenia; Rurka przedłużająca; Elastyczna rurka do ustnika; Instrukcja obsługi / śpiewnik; Ustnik; Zapasowy ustnik; Pasek na nadgarstek; Inne
es: Accesorios incluidos con la melódica: Bolsa de transporte (blanda); Estuche de transporte (rígido); Cepillo/hisopo de limpieza; Paño de limpieza; Tubo de extensión; Tubo bucal flexible; Manual de instrucciones/cancionero; Boquilla; Boquilla de repuesto; Correa para la muñeca; Otro
en: Melodica included accessories: Carrying bag (soft); Carrying case (hard); Cleaning brush/swab; Cleaning cloth; Extension tube; Flexible mouth tube; Instruction manual / songbook; Mouthpiece; Spare mouthpiece; Wrist strap; Other
ja: メロディカに含まれるアクセサリー: キャリングバッグ (ソフト); キャリングケース (ハード); クリーニングブラシ/スワブ; クリーニングクロス; 延長チューブ; フレキシブルマウスチューブ; 取扱説明書 / 楽譜; マウスピース; 予備マウスピース; リストストラップ; その他
zh-TW: 口風琴包含配件: 便攜袋 (軟質); 攜帶盒 (硬質); 清潔刷/清潔棒; 清潔布; 延長管; 吹奏軟管; 使用手冊/樂譜; 吹嘴; 備用吹嘴; 腕帶; 其他
nb: Inkludet melodika-tilbehør: Bærebag (myk); Bæreveske (hard); Rengjøringsbørste/-kost; Pusseklut; Forlengelsesrør; Fleksibelt rør; Instruksjonsmanual / sangbok; Munnstykke; Ekstra munnstykke; Håndleddsstropp; Annet
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมที่มาพร้อมกับเมโลดิกา: กระเป๋าพกพา (แบบนุ่ม); เคสพกพา (แบบแข็ง); แปรง/ไม้พันสำลีทำความสะอาด; ผ้าทำความสะอาด; ท่อต่อความยาว; ท่อเป่าแบบยืดหยุ่น; คู่มือการใช้งาน/หนังสือเพลง; เมาส์พีซ; เมาส์พีซสำรอง; สายรัดข้อมือ; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Prie melodikos pridedami priedai: Nešiojimo krepšys (minkštas); Nešiojimo dėklas (kietas); Valymo šepetėlis / šluostė; Valymo šluostė; Ilginamasis vamzdelis; Lankstus burnos vamzdelis; Naudojimo instrukcija / dainų knygelė; Kandiklis; Atsarginis kandiklis; Riešo dirželis; Kita
sv: Ingående tillbehör för melodika: Bärväska (mjuk); Bärväska (hård); Rengöringsborste/svabb; Rengöringsduk; Förlängningsslang; Flexibel munslang; Instruktionsbok/sångbok; Munstycke; Reservmunstycke; Handledsrem; Annat
ro-RO: Accesorii incluse pentru melodică: Geantă de transport (moale); Casetă de transport (rigidă); Perie/tampon de curățare; Lavetă de curățare; Tub prelungitor; Tub flexibil pentru gură; Manual de instrucțiuni / carte de cântece; Muștiuc; Muștiuc de rezervă; Curea pentru încheietură; Altele